Utah statutes.
78B-19-106.   Proceedings pending before tribunal -- Status report.

(1)  Persons in a proceeding pending before a tribunal may sign a collaborative law participation agreement to seek to resolve a collaborative matter related to the proceeding.  Parties shall file promptly with the tribunal a notice of the agreement after it is signed.  Subject to Subsection (3) and Sections 78B-19-107 and 78B-19-108, the filing shall include a request for a stay of the proceeding.

(2)  Parties shall file promptly with the tribunal notice in a record when a collaborative law process concludes and request the stay to be lifted.  The notice may not specify any reason for termination of the process.

(3)  A tribunal in which a proceeding is stayed under Subsection (1) may require parties and collaborative lawyers to provide a status report on the collaborative law process and the proceeding.  A status report may include only information on whether the process is ongoing or concluded.  It may not include a report, assessment, evaluation, recommendation, finding, or other communication regarding a collaborative law process or collaborative law matter.

(4)  A tribunal shall provide parties notice and an opportunity to be heard before dismissing a proceeding in which a notice of collaborative process is filed based on delay or failure to prosecute.

